Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 2. Debtors' Remedies

§ 40-14-520.
Interests in land.

For purposes of the provisions of this part on civil liability for violation of disclosure provisions (W.S.

40-14-522

) and on a debtor’s right to rescind certain transactions as otherwise provided by law:

Consumer credit sale includes a sale of an interest in land without regard to the rate of the credit service charge if the sale is otherwise a consumer credit sale (W.S.

40-14-204

); and

Consumer loan includes a loan primarily secured by an interest in land, as defined in W.S. 40-14-304(c).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 5-201; W.S. 1957, § 40-5-201; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in (a), substituted "as otherwise provided by law" for "(W.S.

40-14-523

)" and made a stylistic change; and substituted ", as defined in W.S. 40-14-304(c)" for "without regard to the rate of the loan finance charge if the loan is otherwise a consumer loan (W.S.

40-14-305

)" in (a)(ii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 40-14-521.
Effect of violations on rights of parties.

If a creditor has violated the provisions of this act applying to certain negotiable instruments (W.S.

40-14-237

), the debtor is not obligated to pay the credit service charge or loan finance charge, and has a right to recover from the person violating this act or from an assignee of that person’s rights who undertakes direct collection of payments or enforcement of rights arising from the debt a penalty in an amount determined by the court not in excess of three (3) times the amount of the credit service charge or loan finance charge. No action pursuant to this subsection may be brought more than one (1) year after the due date of the last scheduled payment of the agreement with respect to which the violation occurred.

If a creditor has violated the provisions of this act applying to licensure to make consumer loans (W.S.

40-14-302

), the loan is void and the debtor is not obligated to pay either the principal or loan finance charge. If he has paid any part of the principal or of the loan finance charge, he has a right to recover the payment from the person violating this act or from an assignee of that person’s rights who undertakes direct collection of payments or enforcement of rights arising from the debt. With respect to violations arising from other loans, no action pursuant to this subsection may be brought more than one (1) year after the due date of the last scheduled payment of the agreement pursuant to which the charge was paid.

A debtor is not obligated to pay a charge in excess of that allowed by this act, and if he has paid an excess charge he has a right to a refund. A refund may be made by reducing the debtor’s obligation by the amount of the excess charge. If the debtor has paid an amount in excess of the lawful obligation under the agreement, the debtor may recover the excess amount from the person who made the excess charge or from an assignee of that person’s rights who undertakes direct collection of payments from or enforcement of rights against debtors arising from the debt.

If a debtor is entitled to a refund and a person liable to the debtor refuses to make a refund within a reasonable time after demand, the debtor may recover from that person a penalty in an amount determined by a court not exceeding the greater of either the amount of the credit service or loan finance charge or ten (10) times the amount of the excess charge. If the creditor has made an excess charge in deliberate violation of or in reckless disregard for this act, the penalty may be recovered even though the creditor has refunded the excess charge. No penalty pursuant to this subsection may be recovered if a court has ordered a similar penalty assessed against the same person in a civil action by the administrator (W.S.

40-14-613

). With respect to excess charges arising from sales made pursuant to revolving charge accounts or from loans made pursuant to revolving loan accounts, no action pursuant to this subsection may be brought more than two (2) years after the time the excess charge was made. With respect to excess charges arising from other consumer credit sales or consumer loans, no action pursuant to this subsection may be brought more than one (1) year after the due date of the last scheduled payment of the agreement pursuant to which the charge was made.

Except as otherwise provided, no violation of this act impairs rights on a debt.

If an employer discharges an employee in violation of the provisions prohibiting discharge (W.S.

40-14-506

), the employee may within forty-five (45) days bring a civil action for recovery of wages lost as a result of the violation and for an order requiring the reinstatement of the employee. Damages recoverable shall not exceed lost wages for six (6) weeks.

If the creditor establishes by a preponderance of evidence that a violation is unintentional or the result of a bona fide error, no liability is imposed under subsections (a), (b) and (d) of this section and the validity of the transaction is not affected.

In any case in which it is found that a creditor has violated this act, the court may award reasonable attorney’s fees incurred by the debtor.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 5-202; W.S. 1957, § 40-5-202; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to change in terms of revolving charge account, see §

40-14-250

.

As to change in the terms of revolving loan account, see §

40-14-339

.

As to multiple loan agreements, see §

40-14-349

.

As to excess charge for insurance, see §

40-14-404

.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted "or limitations on the schedule of payments or loan term for supervised loans (W.S.

40-14-351

)," preceding "the debtor" in the first sentence of (a); in the first sentence of (b), "substituted "licensure " for "authority," "consumer" for "supervised," "(W.S.

40-14-302

)" for "(W.S.

40-14-342

)" and deleted the former third sentence, which read, "With respect to violations arising from other loans, no action pursuant to this subsection may be brought more than two (2) years after the violation occurred."

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

Quoted

in

Stevens v. Rock Springs Nat'l Bank, 577 P.2d 1374,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 286

(Wyo. 1978).

§ 40-14-522.
Civil liability for violation of disclosure provisions.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a creditor who, in violation of the laws relating to disclosure, other than the provisions on advertising (sections 2-313 and 3-312 [Repealed]), of the article on credit sales (article 2) and the article on loans (article 3), fails to disclose information to a person entitled to the information under this act is liable to that person in an amount equal to the sum of:

Twice the amount of the credit service or loan finance charge in connection with the transaction, but the liability pursuant to this paragraph shall be not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00); and

In the case of a successful action to enforce the liability under paragraph (a)(i) of this section, the costs of the action together with reasonable attorney’s fees as determined by the court.

A creditor has no liability under this section if within fifteen (15) days after discovering an error, and prior to the institution of an action under this section or the receipt of written notice of the error, the creditor notifies the person concerned of the error and makes whatever adjustments in the appropriate account are necessary to assure that the person will not be required to pay a credit service charge or loan finance charge in excess of the amount or percentage rate actually disclosed.

A creditor may not be held liable in any action brought under this section for a violation of this act if the creditor shows by a preponderance of evidence that the violation was not intentional and resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adapted to avoid the error.

Any action, which may be brought under this section against the original creditor in any credit transaction which does not involve a security interest in land, may be maintained against any subsequent assignee of the original creditor where the violation from which the alleged liability arose is apparent on the face of the instrument assigned unless the assignment is involuntary.

Any action which may be brought under this section against the original creditor in any credit transaction involving a security interest in land may be maintained against any subsequent assignee of the original creditor where the assignee, its subsidiaries, or affiliates were in a continuing business relationship with the original creditor either at the time the credit was extended or at the time of the assignment, unless the assignment was involuntary, or the assignee shows by a preponderance of evidence that it did not have reasonable grounds to believe that the original creditor was engaged in violations of W.S.

40-14-101

through

40-14-649

and that it maintained procedures reasonably adapted to apprise it of the existence of the violations.

No action pursuant to this section may be brought more than one (1) year after the date of the occurrence of the violation.

Repealed by Laws 1988, ch. 49, § 2.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 5-203; W.S. 1957, § 40-5-203; Laws 1975, ch. 167, § 1; 1988, ch. 49, § 2; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "40-14-649" for "40-14-702" in (e).

Editor's notes. —

Sections 2-313 and 3-312 of the Uniform Consumer Credit Code, referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a), appeared as §§ 40-14-234 and 40-14-331, respectively, before being repealed in 1982.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

§ 40-14-523.
Debtor's right to rescind certain transactions. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2013, Ch. 124, § 3.

§ 40-14-524.
Refunds and penalties as setoff to obligation.

Refunds or penalties to which the debtor is entitled pursuant to this part may be set off against the debtor’s obligation, and may be raised as a defense to a suit on the obligation without regard to the time limitations prescribed by this part.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 5-205; W.S. 1957, § 40-5-205.